Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5937.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1301. As used in this part: (a) "Application period" means the period beginning that begins when an application for a permit is received by the this state and ending ends when the application is considered to be administratively complete under section 1305 and any applicable fee has been is paid. (b) "Department" means the department, agency, or officer authorized by this act to approve or deny an application for a particular permit. As used in sections 1315 to 1317, "department" means the department of environmental quality.environment, Great Lakes, and energy. (c) "Director" means the director of the state department authorized under this act to approve or deny an application for a particular permit or the director's designee. As used in sections 1313 to 1317, "director" means the director of the department of environmental quality.environment, Great Lakes, and energy. (d) "Environmental permit review commission" or "commission" means the environmental permit review commission established under section 1313(1). (e) "Environmental permit panel" or "panel" means a panel of the environmental permit review commission, appointed under section 1315(2). (f) "Permit", except as provided in subdivision (g), means a permit, operating license, or registration required by any of the following sections or by rules promulgated thereunder, or, in the case of section 9112, by an ordinance referred to in that section: (i) Section 3104, floodplain alteration permit. (ii) Section 3503, permit for use of water in mining iron ore. (iii) Section 4105, sewerage system construction permit. (iv) Section 6516, vehicle testing license. (v) Section 6521, motor vehicle fleet testing permit. (vi) Section 8310, restricted use pesticide dealer license. (vii) Section 8310a, agricultural pesticide dealer license. (viii) Section 8504, license to manufacture or distribute fertilizer. (ix) Section 9112, local soil erosion and sedimentation control permit. (x) Section 11509, solid waste disposal area construction permit. (xi) Section 11512, solid waste disposal area operating license. (xii) Section 11542, municipal solid waste incinerator ash landfill operating license amendment. (xiii) Section 11702, septage waste servicing license or septage waste vehicle license. (xiv) Section 11709, septage waste site permit. (xv) Section 30104, inland lakes and streams project permit. (xvi) Section 30304, state permit for dredging, filling, or other activity in wetland. Permit includes an authorization for a specific project to proceed under a general permit issued under section 30312. (xvii) Section 31509, dam construction, repair, or removal permit. (xviii) Section 32312, flood risk, high risk, or environmental area permit. (xix) Section 32512, permit for dredging and filling bottomland. (xx) Section 32603, permit for submerged log removal from Great Lakes bottomlands. (xxi) Section 35304, department permit for critical dune area use. (xxii) Section 36505, endangered species permit. (xxiii) Section 41329, nonnative aquatic species sales registration. (xxiv) Section 41702, game bird hunting preserve license. (xxv) Section 42101, dog training area permit. (xxvi) Section 42501, fur dealer's license. (xxvii) Section 42702, game dealer's license. (xxviii) Section 44513, charter boat operating permit under reciprocal agreement. (xxix) Section 44516, boat livery operating permit. (xxx) Section 45902, game fish propagation license. (xxxi) Section 45906, game fish import license. (xxxii) Section 48705, permit to take amphibians and reptiles for scientific or educational use. (xxxiii) Section 61525, oil or gas well drilling permit. (xxxiv) Section 62509, brine, storage, or waste disposal well drilling or conversion permit or test well drilling permit. (xxxv) Section 63103a, ferrous mineral mining permit. (xxxvi) Section 63514 or 63525, surface coal mining and reclamation permit or revision of the permit, respectively. (xxxvii) Section 63704, sand dune mining permit. (xxxviii) Section 72108, use permits for a Pure Michigan Trail. (xxxix) Section 76109, sunken aircraft or watercraft abandoned property recovery permit. (xl) (xxxx) Section 76504, Mackinac Island motor vehicle and land use permits. (xli) (xxxxi) Section 80159, buoy or beacon permit. (g) "Permit", as used in sections 1313 to 1317, means any permit or operating license that meets both of the following conditions: (i) The applicant for the permit or operating license is not this state or a political subdivision of this state. (ii) The permit or operating license is issued by the department of environmental quality environment, Great Lakes, and energy under this act or the rules promulgated under this act. (h) "Processing deadline" means the last day of the processing period. (i) "Processing period", subject to section 1307(2) and (3), means the following time period after the close of the application period, for the following permit, as applicable: (i) Twenty days for a permit under section 61525 or 62509. (ii) Thirty days for a permit under section 9112 or 44516. (iii) Thirty days after the department consults with the underwater salvage and preserve committee created under section 76103, for a permit under section 76109. (iv) Thirty days or, if a hearing is held, 90 days for a permit under section 30304. (v) (iv) Sixty days , for a permit under section 30104 for a minor project established under section 30105(7) or 32512a(1), or an authorization for a specific project to proceed under a general permit issued under section 30105(8) or 32512a(2), or for a permit under section 32312 or 41329. (vi) (v) Sixty days or, if a hearing is held, 90 days for a permit under section 35304. (vii) (vi) Sixty days or, if a hearing is held, 120 days for a permit under section 30104, other than a permit or authorization described in subparagraph (ii) or (iv), or for a permit under section 31509. (viii) (vii) Ninety days for a permit under section 11512, a revision of a surface coal mining and reclamation permit under section 63525, or a permit under section 72108. (ix) (viii) Ninety days or, if a hearing is held, 150 days for a permit under section 3104, or 30304, or a permit under section 32512 other than a permit described in subparagraph (iv). (x) (ix) Ninety days after the close of the review or comment period under section 32604, or if a public hearing is held, 90 days after the date of the public hearing for a permit under section 32603. (xi) (x) One hundred twenty days for a permit under section 11509, 11542, 63103a, 63514, or 63704. (xii) (xi) One hundred fifty days for a permit under section 36505. However, if a site inspection or federal approval is required, the 150-day period is tolled pending completion of the inspection or receipt of the federal approval. (xiii) (xii) For any other permit, 150 days or, if a hearing is held, 90 days after the hearing, whichever is later. Sec. 1305. (1) After a department receives an application for a permit, the department shall determine whether the application is administratively complete. Unless the department proceeds as provided under subsection (2), the application shall be is considered to be administratively complete when the department makes that determination or 30 7 days after the state department receives the application, whichever is first. (2) If, before the expiration of the 30-day 7-day period under subsection (1), the department notifies the applicant that the application is not administratively complete , specifying and specifies the information necessary to make the application administratively complete, or notifies the applicant that a fee required to accompany the application has not been paid , specifying and specifies the amount due, the running of the 30-day 7-day period under subsection (1) is tolled until the applicant submits to the department the specified information or fee amount due. The notice shall must be given in writing or by electronic notification. (3) Subject to subsection (4), after an application for a permit is considered to be administratively complete under this section, the department shall not request from the applicant any new or additional information that is not specified in the list required under section 1303(2)(a) unless the request includes a detailed explanation of why the information is needed. The applicant is not required to provide the requested information as a condition for approval of the permit. (4) After an application for a permit is considered to be administratively complete under this section, the department may request the applicant to clarify, amplify, or correct the information required for the application. The applicant shall provide the requested information. Sec. 3112. (1) A person shall not discharge any waste or waste effluent into the waters of this the state unless the person is in possession of a valid permit from the department. (2) An application for a permit under subsection (1) shall must be submitted to the department. Within 30 Not later than 7 days after an application for a new or increased use is received, the department shall determine whether the application is administratively complete. Within 90 Not later than 7 days after an application for reissuance of a permit is received, the department shall determine whether the application is administratively complete. If the department determines that an application is not administratively complete, the department shall notify the applicant in writing within the applicable time period. If the department does not make a determination as to whether the application is administratively complete within the applicable time period, the application shall be is considered to be complete. (3) The department shall condition the continued validity of a permit upon on the permittee's permittee meeting the effluent requirements that the department considers necessary to prevent unlawful pollution by the dates that the department considers to be reasonable and necessary and to ensure compliance with applicable federal law. If the department finds that the terms of a permit have been, are being, or may be violated, it the department may modify, suspend, or revoke the permit or grant the permittee a reasonable period of time in which to comply with the permit. The department may reissue a revoked permit upon on a showing satisfactory to the department that the permittee has corrected the violation. A person who that has had a permit revoked may apply for a new permit. (4) If the department determines that a person is causing or is about to cause unlawful pollution of the waters of this the state, the department may notify the alleged offender of its the department's determination and enter an order requiring that requires the person to abate the pollution or may refer the matter to the attorney general for legal action, or both. (5) A person who that is aggrieved by an order of abatement of the department or by the reissuance, modification, suspension, or revocation of an existing permit of the department executed pursuant to under this section may file a sworn petition with the department setting that sets forth the grounds and reasons for the complaint and requesting requests a contested case hearing on the matter pursuant to under the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. A petition filed more than 60 days after action on the order or permit may be rejected by the department as being untimely. (6) All oceangoing vessels engaging in port operations in this state shall obtain a permit from the department. The department shall issue a permit for an oceangoing vessel only if the applicant can demonstrate that the oceangoing vessel complies with 33 CFR 151.1510 as then in effect or the oceangoing vessel will utilize environmentally sound technology and methods approved by the department that prevent the discharge of aquatic nuisance species. However, all of the following shall apply: (a) The grant by the coast guard of an extension to the implementation schedule under 33 CFR 151.1513 or the exchange of ballast water under 33 CFR 151.1510(a)(1) or saltwater flushing under 33 CFR 401.30 alone is not considered compliance with the federal aquatic nuisance rule for the purposes of this section. (b) A vessel discharging ballast water must employ a ballast water management system approved pursuant to under 33 CFR 151.1510(A)(3) 151.1510(a)(3) or a ballast water treatment method approved by the department. (c) A vessel must carry out an exchange of ballast water or saltwater flushing and comply with other applicable requirements of 33 CFR part 151, subpart C, and 33 CFR 401.30. (d) A vessel using water from a public water system under 33 CFR 151.1510(a)(4) shall must utilize a method to sufficiently clean ballast water tanks prior to before using water from a public water supply system as ballast water as approved by the department. (e) A discharge that may cause or contribute to a violation of a water quality standard is not authorized by a permit described in this subsection. (f) If the federal aquatic nuisance rule is amended after the enactment date of the 2018 amendatory act that added subsection (7), December 28, 2018, and the director determines that the amended version of the federal aquatic nuisance rule is less protective of the waters of this the state from aquatic nuisance species, the applicant shall demonstrate that the oceangoing vessel complies with the federal aquatic nuisance rule as in effect immediately before the effective date of that amendment to the federal aquatic nuisance rule. (g) If pursuant to in accordance with a compact of Great Lakes states of which this state is a part, this state adopts standards more protective of the waters of this the state from aquatic nuisance species than the version of the federal aquatic nuisance rule otherwise applicable under this subsection, the standards adopted pursuant to in accordance with the compact apply. (7) The intent of the legislature in adopting in part the federal aquatic nuisance rule by reference is to help harmonize regulatory programs in Great Lakes states for preventing the introduction and spread of aquatic nuisance species in the Great Lakes, including ballast water management programs, and to allow regulatory agencies to cooperate in developing stronger programs. (8) Permit fees for permits under subsection (6) shall must be assessed as provided in section 3120. The permit fees for an individual permit issued under subsection (6) are the fees specified in section 3120(1)(a) and (5)(a). The permit fees for a general permit issued under subsection (6) are the fees specified in section 3120(1)(c) and (5)(b)(i). Permits under subsection (6) shall must be issued in accordance with the timelines provided in section 3120. The department may promulgate rules to implement subsections (6) to (8). (9) As used in this section, "federal aquatic nuisance rule" means 33 CFR part 151, subpart C, and applicable requirements of 33 CFR 151.2050, 151.2060, and 151.2070. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) House Bill No. 5936. (b) House Bill No. 5938. (c) House Bill No. 6038.